fi: Hyppynarun suunnittelu: Tavallinen; Älykäs; Muu
hr-HR: Dizajn užeta za preskakanje: Uobičajeno; Pametno; Ostalo
th: การออกแบบเชือกกระโดด: แบบปกติ; อัจฉริยะ; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Šokdynės tipas: Įprasta; Išmanioji; Kita
ja: ジャンプロープデザイン: レギュラー; スマート; その他
ru: Тип скакалки: Обычный; Умный; Другой
zh-CN: 跳绳设计: 普通; 智能; 其他
ro-RO: Design coardă pentru sărituri: Normal; Smart; Altele
ko: 줄넘기 디자인: 레귤러; 스마트; 기타
hu: Ugrókötél kialakítása: Normál; Intelligens; Egyéb
tr: Atlama ipi tasarımı: Normal; Akıllı; Diğer
sk-SK: Dizajn švihadla: Bežný; Praktický; Iné
pt-PT: Design de corda de soltar: Tradicionais; Inteligente; Outro
fr: Conception de la corde à sauter: Normale; Intelligent; Autre
bg-BG: Дизайн на въже за скачане: Обикновен; Смарт; Други
cs: Design švihadla: Běžná; Inteligentní; Jiné
es: Diseño de la comba: Regular; Inteligente; Otros
zh-TW: 跳繩設計: 一般; 智慧; 其他
vi: Thiết kế dây nhảy: Loại thông thường; Thông minh; Khác
nl: Ontwerp springtouw: Normaal; Smart; Andere
pt-BR: Design de corda de pular: Regular; Inteligente; Outro
it: Progettazione della corda per saltare: Regular; Smart; Altro
sl-SI: Zasnova kolebnice: Običajna; Pametna; Drugo
de: Springseil-Design: Normal; Smart; Sonstiges
pl: Konstrukcja skakanki: Zwyczajne; Inteligentny; Inne
en: Jump rope design: Regular; Smart; Other
sv: Design på hopprep: Vanligt; Smart; Övrigt
nb: Hoppetaudesign: Vanlig; Smart; Annet
el: Σχεδιασμός σχοινιού γυμναστικής: Κανονική; Εξυπνος; Άλλο
da: Sjippetovdesign: Almindelig; Smart; Andet